fr: Matériau de la fenêtre d’observation: Acrylique; Verre; Plastique; Polycarbonate (PC); Autre
nl: Observatievenster materiaal: Acryl; Glas; Plastic; Polycarbonaat (PC); Overig
sl-SI: Material opazovalnega okenca: Akril; Steklo; Plastika; Polikarbonat (PC); Drugo
da: Materiale i observationsvindue: Akryl; Glas; Plastik; Polykarbonat (PC); Andet
vi: Vật liệu cửa sổ quan sát: Acrylic; Kính; Nhựa; Polycarbonate (PC); Khác
hr-HR: Materijal za prozor za promatranje: Akril; Staklo; Plastika; Polikarbonat (PC); Ostalo
ro-RO: Materialul ferestrei de vizualizare: Acrilic; Sticlă; Plastic; Policarbonat (PC); Altele
de: Material des Sichtfensters: Acryl; Glas; Kunststoff; Polycarbonat (PC); Andere
ja: 観察窓の素材: アクリル; ガラス; プラスチック; ポリカーボネート (PC); その他
ko: 관찰창 재질: 아크릴; 유리; 플라스틱; 폴리카보네이트(PC); 기타
sk-SK: Materiál pozorovacieho okienka: Akryl; Sklo; Plast; Polykarbonát (PC); Iný
zh-TW: 觀察窗材質: 壓克力; 玻璃; 塑膠; 聚碳酸酯 (PC); 其他
es: Material de las ventanas de observación: Acrílico; Vidrio; Plástico; Policarbonato (PC); Otro
ru: Материал смотрового окна: Акрил; Стекло; Пластик; Поликарбонат (PC); Другое
pt-PT: Material da janela de observação: Acrílico; Vidro; Plástico; Policarbonato (PC); Outro
cs: Materiál pozorovacího okna: Akryl; Sklo; Plast; Polykarbonát (PC); Ostatní
en: Observation window material: Acrylic; Glass; Plastic; Polycarbonate (PC); Other
pl: Materiał okna obserwacyjnego: Akryl; Szkło; Plastik; Poliwęglan (PC); Inne
hu: Megfigyelőablak anyaga: Akril; Üveg; Műanyag; Polikarbonát (PC); Egyéb
it: Materiale della finestra di osservazione: Acrilico; Vetro; Plastica; Policarbonato (PC); Altro
sv: Material för observationsfönstret: Akryl; Glas; Plast; Polykarbonat (PC); Övrigt
pt-BR: Janela de observação material: Acrílico; Vidro; Plástico; Policarbonato (PC); Outro
bg-BG: Материал на прозореца за наблюдение: Акрил; Стъкло; Пластмаса; Поликарбонат (PC); Друго
zh-CN: 观察窗材质: 亚克力; 玻璃; 塑料; 聚碳酸酯 (PC); 其他
nb: Materiale i visningsvindu: Akryl; Glass; Plast; Polykarbonat (PC); Annet
th: วัสดุหน้าต่างสังเกตการณ์: อะคริลิก; กระจก; พลาสติก; โพลิคาร์บอเนต (PC); อื่นๆ
fi: Tarkkailuikkunan materiaali: Akryyli; Lasi; Muovi; Polykarbonaatti (PC); Muu
lt-LT: Stebėjimo langelio medžiaga: Akrilas; Stiklas; Plastikas; Polikarbonatas (PC); Kita
el: Υλικό παραθύρου παρατήρησης: Ακρυλικό; Γυαλί; Πλαστικό; Πολυανθρακικό (PC); Άλλο
tr: Gözlem penceresi malzemesi: Akrilik; Cam; Plastik; Polikarbonat (PC); Diğer